Washington statutes.
RCW 19.25.050

Contraband recordings—Disposition, forfeiture, penalty.

(1) All recordings which have been fixed transferred, or possessed without the consent of the owner in violation of RCW 19.25.020 or 19.25.030, and any recording which does not contain the true name and address of the manufacturer in violation of RCW 19.25.040 shall be deemed to be contraband. The court shall order the seizure, forfeiture, and destruction or other disposition of such contraband.

(2) The owner or the prosecuting attorney may institute proceedings to forfeit contraband recordings. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to any contraband recording, regardless of lack of knowledge or intent on the part of the possessor, retail seller, manufacturer, or distributor.

(3) Whenever a person is convicted of a violation under this chapter, the court, in its judgment of conviction, shall, in addition to the penalty therein prescribed, order the forfeiture and destruction or other disposition of all contraband recordings and any and all electronic, mechanical, or other devices for manufacturing, reproducing, packaging, or assembling such recordings, which were used to facilitate any violation of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 38 s 5.]